errortag-src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON OKTAGOALMMATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTAVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Use/NG:%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub+Use/NG:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON OKTAGUDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Attr+Use/NG:%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Attr+Use/NG:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Pl+Com+Use/Sub:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ; ! because of speller
 +Num+Ess+Use/NG:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
ok0ta#goalmmát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#njealját#lohkái:ok'ta OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#viđát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#guđát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
ok0ta#goalmmát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAGOALMMATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#njealját#lohkái:ok'ta OKTANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#viđát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAVIDATLOHKAI ;
ok0ta#guđát#lohkái:ok'ta OKTAGUDATLOHKAI ;
